Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1613
Life insurance; individual policy; time within which to exercise rights; notice.

If any individual insured under a group life insurance policy hereafter delivered in this state becomes entitled under the terms of such policy to have an individual policy of life insurance issued without evidence of insurability, subject to making of application and payment of the first premium within the period specified in such policy, and if such individual is not given notice of the existence of such right at least fifteen days prior to the expiration date of such period, then in such event the individual shall have an additional period within which to exercise such right, but nothing herein contained shall be construed to continue any insurance beyond the period provided in such policy. This additional period shall expire fifteen days after the individual is given such notice but in no event shall such additional period extend beyond sixty days after the expiration date of the period provided in such policy. Written notice presented to the individual or mailed by the policyholder to the last-known address of the individual or mailed by the insurer to the last-known address of the individual as furnished by the policyholder shall constitute notice for the purpose of this section.

Laws 1957, c. 192, § 8, p. 681;

Laws 2008, LB855, § 18.